American private spacecraft company This article rocket spacecraft manufacturer. For British art gallery see Spacex art gallery. Space Exploration Technologies Corporation commonly referred SpaceX American spacecraft manufacturer launch service provider satellite communications company headquartered Hawthorne California. The company founded two thousand two Elon Musk goal reducing space transportation costs ultimately developing sustainable colony Mars. The company currently produces operates Falcon nine Falcon Heavy rockets along Dragon Starship spacecraft. The company offers internet service via Starlink subsidiary became largest ever satellite constellation January two thousand twenty April two thousand twentyfour update comprised six zero small satellites orbit. eight Meanwhile company developing Starship human rated fully reusable super heavy lift launch system interplanetary orbital spaceflight.  first flight April two thousand twentythree became largest powerful rocket ever flown. The rocket reached space second flight took place November 2023. SpaceX first private company develop liquid propellant rocket reached orbit launch orbit recover spacecraft send spacecraft International Space Station send astronauts International Space Station.  also first organization type achieve vertical propulsive landing orbital rocket booster first reuse booster. The company Falcon nine rockets landed flown three hundred times. nine As December two thousand twentythree SpaceX around  one hundred eighty billion valuation. ten eleven History twenty million twelve thousand four Founding  early two thousand one Elon Musk met Robert Zubrin donated  one hundred zero Mars Society joining board directors short time. twelve three thousand thirtyone  gave plenary talk fourth convention announced Mars Oasis project land greenhouse grow plants Mars. thirteen fourteen Musk initially attempted acquire Dnepr intercontinental ballistic missile project Russian contacts Jim Cantrell. fifteen Musk returned team second time Moscow time bringing Michael Griffin well found Russians increasingly unreceptive. sixteen seventeen  flight home Musk announced could start company build affordable rockets needed instead. seventeen  applying vertical integration sixteen using cheap commercial shelf components possible seventeen adopting modular approach modern software engineering Musk believed SpaceX could significantly cut launch cost. seventeen  early two thousand two Elon Musk started look staff company soon named SpaceX. Musk approached five people initial positions fledgling company including Michael Griffin declined position Chief Engineer eighteen Jim Cantrel John Garvey Cantrel Garvey would later found company Vector Launch rocket engineer Tom Mueller Chris Thompson. nineteen twenty SpaceX first headquartered warehouse  Segundo California. Early SpaceX employees Tom Mueller CTO Gwynne Shotwell COO Chris Thompson  Operations came neighboring TRW Boeing corporations.  November two thousand five company one hundred sixty employees. twentyone Musk personally interviewed approved SpaceX early employees. twentytwo Musk stated one goals SpaceX decrease cost improve reliability access space ultimately factor ten. twentythree twenty million fiftytwo thousand nine Falcon one first orbital launches SpaceX developed first orbital launch vehicle Falcon one internal funding. twentyfour twentyfive The Falcon one expendable two stage orbit small lift launch vehicle. The total development cost Falcon one approximately ninety million twentysix one hundred million. twentyseven The Falcon rocket series named Star Wars Millennium Falcon fictional spacecraft. twentyeight  two thousand four SpaceX protested NASA Government Accountability Office GAO sole source contract awarded Kistler Aerospace. Before GAO could respond NASA withdrew contract formed COTS program. twentynine thirty  two thousand five SpaceX announced plans pursue human rated commercial space program end decade program would later become Dragon spacecraft. thirtyone  two thousand six company selected NASA awarded three hundred ninetysix million provide crew cargo resupply demonstration contracts International Space Station ISS COTS program. thirtytwo The first two Falcon one launches purchased United States Department Defense DARPA Falcon Project evaluated new  launch vehicles suitable use hypersonic missile delivery Prompt Global Strike. twentyfive thirtythree thirtyfour The first three launches rocket two thousand six two thousand eight resulted failures almost ended company. Financing Tesla Motors failed well thirtyfive consequently Tesla SolarCity Musk personally nearly bankrupt time. thirtysix Musk reportedly waking nightmares screaming physical pain stress. thirtyseven The financial situation started turn around first successful launch achieved fourth attempt twentyeight September 2008. Musk split remaining thirty million SpaceX Tesla NASA awarded first Commercial Resupply Services CRS contract awarding .  billion SpaceX December thus financially saving company. thirtyeight Based factors business operations enabled Falcon one soon retired following second successful fifth total launch July 2009. This allowed SpaceX focus company resources development larger orbital rocket Falcon . thirtynine Gwynne Shotwell also promoted company president time role successfully negotiating CRS contract NASA Associate Administrator Bill Gerstenmaier. forty fortyone twenty million one hundred two thousand twelve Falcon nine Dragon NASA contracts SpaceX originally intended follow light Falcon one launch vehicle intermediate capacity vehicle Falcon . fortytwo The company instead decided two thousand five proceed development Falcon nine reusable heavier lift vehicle. Development Falcon nine accelerated NASA committed purchasing several commercial flights specific capabilities demonstrated. This started seed money Commercial Orbital Transportation Services COTS program 2006. fortythree The overall contract award two hundred seventyeight million provide development funding Dragon spacecraft Falcon nine demonstration launches Falcon nine Dragon. fortythree As part contract Falcon nine launched first time June two thousand ten Dragon Spacecraft Qualification Unit using mockup Dragon spacecraft. The first operational Dragon spacecraft launched December two thousand ten aboard COTS Demo Flight one Falcon nine second flight safely returned Earth two orbits completing mission objectives. fortyfour  December two thousand ten SpaceX production line manufacturing one Falcon nine Dragon every three months. fortyfive  April two thousand eleven part second round Commercial Crew Development CCDev program NASA issued seventyfive million contract SpaceX develop integrated launch escape system Dragon preparation human rating crew transport vehicle ISS. fortysix NASA awarded SpaceX fixed price Space Act Agreement SAA produce detailed design crew transportation system August 2012. fortyseven  early two thousand twelve approximately two thirds SpaceX stock owned Musk fortyeight seventy million shares estimated worth eight hundred seventyfive million private markets fortynine valuing SpaceX .  billion. fifty  May two thousand twelve Dragon  launch Dragon became first commercial spacecraft deliver cargo International Space Station. fiftyone After flight company private equity valuation nearly doubled .  billion twenty share. fiftytwo fiftythree  time SpaceX operated total funding approximately one billion first decade operation.  private equity provided approximately two hundred million Musk investing approximately one hundred million investors put one hundred million. fiftyfour SpaceX active reusability test program began late two thousand twelve testing low altitude low speed aspects landing technology. fiftyfive The Falcon nine prototypes performed vertical takeoffs landings VTOL. High velocity high altitude tests booster atmospheric return technology began late 2013. fiftyfive twenty million one hundred thirtytwo thousand fifteen Commercial launches rapid growth SpaceX launched first commercial mission private customer 2013.  two thousand fourteen SpaceX nine contracts twenty openly competed worldwide. fiftysix That year Arianespace requested European governments provide additional subsidies face competition SpaceX. fiftyseven fiftyeight Beginning two thousand fourteen SpaceX capabilities pricing also began affect market launch YOU. S. military payloads nearly decade dominated large YOU. S. launch provider United Launch Alliance ULA. fiftynine The monopoly allowed launch costs YOU. S. provider rise four hundred million years. sixty  September two thousand fourteen NASA Director Commercial Spaceflight Kevin Crigler awarded SpaceX Commercial Crew Transportation Capability CCtCap contract finalize development Crew Transportation System. The contract included several technical certification milestones uncrewed flight test crewed flight test six operational missions certification. fortyseven  January two thousand fifteen SpaceX raised one billion funding Google Fidelity Investments exchange .  company establishing company valuation approximately twelve billion. sixtyone The month SpaceX announced development new satellite constellation called Starlink provide global broadband internet service four zero satellites. sixtytwo The Falcon nine first major failure late June two thousand fifteen seventh ISS resupply mission CRS seven exploded two minutes flight. The problem traced failed two foot long steel strut held helium pressure vessel broke free due force acceleration. This caused breach allowed high pressure helium escape low pressure propellant tank causing failure. sixtythree twenty million one hundred fiftytwo thousand seventeen Reusability milestones SpaceX first achieved successful landing recovery first stage December two thousand fifteen Falcon nine Flight twenty. sixtyfour  April two thousand sixteen company achieved first successful landing autonomous spaceport drone ship ASDS  Course I Still Love You Atlantic Ocean. sixtyfive  October two thousand sixteen following successful landings SpaceX indicated offering customers ten price discount choose fly payload reused Falcon nine first stage. sixtysix A second major rocket failure happened early September two thousand sixteen Falcon nine exploded propellant fill operation standard pre launch static fire test. The payload AMOS six communications satellite valued two hundred million destroyed. sixtyseven The explosion caused liquid oxygen used propellant turning cold solidified ignited carbon composite helium vessels. sixtyeight Though considered unsuccessful flight rocket explosion sent company four month launch hiatus worked went wrong. SpaceX returned flight January 2017. sixtynine  March two thousand seventeen SpaceX launched returned Falcon nine SES ten satellite. This first time launch payload carrying orbital rocket went back space. seventy The first stage recovered also making first landing reused orbital class rocket. seventyone twenty million one hundred seventytwo thousand eighteen Leading global commercial launch provider  July two thousand seventeen company raised three hundred fifty million raised valuation twentyone billion. seventytwo  two thousand seventeen SpaceX achieved fortyfive global market share awarded commercial launch contracts. seventythree  March two thousand eighteen SpaceX one hundred launches manifest representing twelve billion contract revenue. seventyfour The contracts included commercial government NASA DOD customers. seventyfive This made SpaceX leading global commercial launch provider measured manifested launches. seventysix  two thousand seventeen SpaceX formed subsidiary The Boring Company seventyseven began work construct short test tunnel adjacent SpaceX headquarters manufacturing facility using small number SpaceX employees seventyeight completed May two thousand eighteen seventynine opened public December 2018. eighty During two thousand eighteen The Boring Company spun separate corporate entity six equity going SpaceX less ten early employees remainder equity Elon Musk. eighty Since two thousand nineteen Starship first crewed launches Starlink general  two thousand nineteen Spacex raised .  billion capital across three funding rounds. eightyone  May two thousand nineteen valuation SpaceX risen .  billion eightytwo reached thirtysix billion March 2020. eightythree  nineteen August two thousand twenty .  billion funding round one largest single fundraising pushes privately held company SpaceX valuation increased fortysix billion. eightyfour eightyfive eightysix  February two thousand twentyone SpaceX raised additional .  billion equity round ninetynine investors eightyseven per share value approximately four hundred twenty eightysix raising company valuation approximately seventyfour billion.  two thousand twentyone SpaceX raised six billion equity financing. Most capital raised since two thousand nineteen used support operational fielding Starlink satellite constellation development manufacture Starship launch vehicle. eightyseven  October two thousand twentyone valuation SpaceX risen 100.  billion. eightyeight  sixteen April two thousand twentyone Starship HLS contract play critical role NASA crewed spaceflight Artemis program. eightynine  two thousand twentyone SpaceX entered agreements Google Cloud Platform Microsoft Azure provide ground computer networking services Starlink. ninety A new round financing two thousand twentytwo valued SpaceX one hundred twentyseven billion. ninetyone  July two thousand twentyone SpaceX unveiled another drone ship named A Shortfall Gravitas landing booster CRS twentythree first time twentynine August 2021. ninetytwo Within first one hundred thirty days two thousand twentytwo SpaceX eighteen rocket launches two astronaut splashdowns.  thirteen December two thousand twentyone company CEO Elon Musk announced company starting carbon dioxide removal program would convert captured carbon rocket fuel ninetythree ninetyfour announced one hundred million donation X Prize Foundation previous February provide monetary rewards winners contest develop best carbon capture technology. ninetyfive ninetysix  August two thousand twentytwo Reuters reported European Space Agency ESA began initial discussions SpaceX could lead company launchers used temporarily given Russia blocked access Soyuz rockets amid Russian invasion Ukraine. ninetyseven Since invasion greater war Russia Ukraine Starlink extensively used. ninetyeight  two thousand twentytwo SpaceX Falcon nine also became world record holder launches single vehicle type single year. ninetynine one hundred non primary source needed SpaceX launched rocket approximately every six days two thousand twentytwo sixtyone launches total. All one Falcon Heavy November Falcon nine rocket. ninetynine  November two thousand twentythree SpaceX announced would acquire parachute supplier Pioneer Aerospace bankruptcy .  million. one hundred one one hundred two Starship  January two thousand nineteen SpaceX announced would lay ten workforce help finance Starship Starlink projects. one hundred three The purpose Starship vehicle enable large scale transit humans cargo Moon Mars beyond. one hundred four Spacex Starship largest powerful rocket ever flown payload capacity one hundred tons. one hundred five one hundred six Construction initial prototypes tests Starship started early two thousand nineteen Florida Texas. All Starship construction testing moved new SpaceX South Texas launch site later year.  twenty April two thousand twentythree Starship first orbital flight test ended mid air explosion Gulf Mexico booster separation. After launch multiple engines booster progressively failed causing vehicle reach max q later planned. Max q theoretical point maximal mechanical stress occurs launch sequence space vehicle.  case rocket must self destructed ascent max q occurs point self destruction. Eventually vehicle lost control spun erratically automated flight termination system activated intentionally destroyed rocket. Elon Musk SpaceX individuals familiar space industry referred test flight success. one hundred seven one hundred eight Musk said time would take six eight weeks get infrastructure prepared another launch.  October two thousand twentythree senior SpaceX executive stated company ready launch next test flight since September.  accused government regulators disrupting project progress adding delay could lead China beating  astronauts back Moon. one hundred nine one hundred ten  eighteen November two thousand twentythree SpaceX launched second integrated Starship test vehicles flying minutes separately exploding. one hundred eleven one hundred twelve one hundred thirteen one hundred fourteen  early March two thousand twentyfour SpaceX announced targeting fourteen March tentative launch date next uncrewed Starship launch configuration flight test pending issuance launch license FAA. This license granted thirteen March 2024. one hundred fifteen  fourteen March two thousand twentyfour thirteen twentyfive UTC Starship launched 3rd time first time Starship reached planned suborbital trajectory. The flight ended booster experiencing malfunction shortly landing ship lost reentry Indian Ocean. one hundred five one hundred six  four June two thousand twentyfour SpaceX received launch license Starships 4th test flight. The licensure notable first time FAA included clause would allow SpaceX launch subsequent test flights without mishap investigation provided met similar launch profile utilized specification hardware. The provision could prove speed development timeline. one hundred sixteen Crewed launches A significant milestone achieved May two thousand twenty SpaceX successfully launched two NASA astronauts Doug Hurley Bob Behnken orbit Crew Dragon spacecraft Crew Dragon Demo two making SpaceX first private company send astronauts International Space Station marking first crewed orbital launch American soil nine years. one hundred seventeen one hundred eighteen The mission launched Kennedy Space Center Launch Complex 39A  39A Kennedy Space Center Florida. one hundred nineteen Starlink  May two thousand nineteen SpaceX launched first large batch sixty Starlink satellites beginning deploy would become world largest commercial satellite constellation following year. one hundred twenty  two thousand twentytwo SpaceX launches focused Starlink consumer internet business sends batches internet beaming satellites six zero satellites orbit. one hundred twentyone  sixteen July two thousand twentyone SpaceX entered agreement acquire Swarm Technologies private company building low Earth orbit satellite constellation communications Internet things IoT devices five hundred twentyfour million. one hundred twentytwo four  December two thousand twentytwo YOU. S. Federal Communications Commission FCC approved launch seven five hundred SpaceX next generation satellites Starlink internet network. one hundred twentythree Summary achievements Hardware Launch vehicles SpaceX developed three launch vehicles. The small lift Falcon one first launch vehicle developed retired 2009. The medium lift Falcon nine heavy lift Falcon Heavy operational. Falcon one small rocket capable placing several hundred kilograms low Earth orbit.  launched five times two thousand six two thousand nine two successful. one hundred fortyfour The Falcon one first privately funded liquid fueled rocket reach orbit. one hundred twentyfour Falcon nine medium lift launch vehicle capable delivering twentytwo eight hundred kilograms fifty two hundred sixtyfive  orbit competing Delta  Atlas V rockets well launch providers around world.  nine Merlin engines first stage. The Falcon nine .  rocket successfully reached orbit first attempt four June 2010. Its third flight COTS Demo Flight two launched twentytwo May two thousand twelve launched first commercial spacecraft reach dock International Space Station ISS. fiftyone The vehicle upgraded Falcon nine .  two thousand thirteen Falcon nine Full Thrust two thousand fifteen finally Falcon nine Block five 2018. The first stage Falcon nine designed retro propulsively land recovered flown. one hundred fortyfive Falcon Heavy heavy lift launch vehicle capable delivering sixtythree eight hundred  one hundred forty seven hundred  Low Earth orbit LEO twentysix seven hundred  fiftyeight nine hundred  geosynchronous transfer orbit GTO.  uses three slightly modified Falcon nine first stage cores total twentyseven Merlin  engines. one hundred fortysix one hundred fortyseven The Falcon Heavy successfully flew inaugural mission six February two thousand eighteen launching Musk personal Tesla Roadster heliocentric orbit one hundred fortyeight Both Falcon nine Falcon Heavy certified conduct launches National Security Space Launch NSSL. one hundred fortynine one hundred fifty As eight June two thousand twentyfour Falcon nine Falcon Heavy launched three hundred fiftyfour times resulting three hundred fiftytwo full mission successes one partial success one flight failure.  addition Falcon nine experienced pre flight failure static fire test 2016. one hundred fiftyone one hundred fiftytwo SpaceX developing fully reusable super heavy lift launch system known Starship.  comprises reusable first stage called Super Heavy reusable Starship second stage space vehicle. As two thousand seventeen update system intended supersede company existing launch vehicle hardware early 2020s. one hundred fiftythree one hundred fiftyfour Rocket engines Since founding SpaceX two thousand two company developed several rocket engines Merlin Kestrel Raptor use launch vehicles one hundred fiftyfive one hundred fiftysix Draco reaction control system Dragon series spacecraft one hundred fiftyseven SuperDraco abort capability Crew Dragon. one hundred fiftyeight Merlin family rocket engines uses liquid oxygen LOX  one propellants. Merlin first used power Falcon one first stage used stages Falcon nine Falcon Heavy vehicles. one hundred fiftynine Kestrel uses propellants used Falcon one rocket second stage main engine. one hundred fiftysix one hundred sixty Draco SuperDraco hypergolic liquid propellant rocket engines. Draco engines used reaction control system Dragon Dragon two spacecraft. one hundred fiftyseven The SuperDraco engine powerful eight SuperDraco engines provide launch escape capability crewed Dragon two spacecraft abort scenario. one hundred sixtyone Raptor new family liquid oxygen liquid methane fueled full flow staged combustion cycle engines power first second stages development Starship launch system. one hundred fiftyfive Development versions test fired late two thousand sixteen one hundred sixtytwo engine flew first time two thousand nineteen powering Starhopper vehicle altitude twenty sixtysix . one hundred sixtythree Dragon spacecraft SpaceX developed Dragon spacecraft transport cargo crew International Space Station. The first version Dragon used cargo first launched 2010. fortyfour The currently operational second generation Dragon spacecraft known Dragon two conducted first flight without crew ISS early two thousand nineteen followed crewed flight Dragon two 2020. one hundred seventeen The cargo variant Dragon two flew first time December two thousand twenty resupply Space Station part CRS contract NASA. one hundred sixtyfour  March two thousand twenty SpaceX revealed Dragon  designed resupply spacecraft NASA planned Lunar Gateway space station Gateway Logistics Services GLS contract. one hundred sixtyfive Dragon  planned launch Falcon Heavy able transport five zero  eleven zero  Gateway. Dragon  docked Gateway six twelve months time. one hundred sixtysix SpaceX designed spacesuit worn inside Dragon spacecraft protect possible depressurization. one hundred sixtyseven  four May two thousand twentyfour SpaceX unveiled second spacesuit designed extravehicular activity planned used spacewalk Polaris Dawn mission. one hundred sixtyeight Autonomous spaceport drone ships SpaceX routinely returns first stage Falcon nine Falcon Heavy rockets orbital launches. The rocket lands predetermined landing site using propulsion systems. one hundred sixtynine When propellant margins permit return launch site RTLS rockets return floating landing platform ocean called autonomous spaceport drone ships ASDS. one hundred seventy SpaceX also plans introduce floating launch platforms. These modified oil rigs use 2020s provide sea launch option second generation launch vehicle heavy lift Starship system consisting Super Heavy booster Starship second stage. Starlink Starlink internet satellite constellation development Starlink Services LLC wholly owned subsidiary SpaceX seven one hundred seventyone consists thousands cross linked communications satellites five hundred fifty  orbits. Its goal address significant unmet demand worldwide low cost broadband capabilities. one hundred seventytwo Development began two thousand fifteen initial prototype test flight satellites launched SpaceX Paz satellite mission 2017.  May two thousand nineteen SpaceX launched first batch sixty satellites aboard Falcon . one hundred seventythree Initial test operation constellation began late two thousand twenty one hundred seventyfour first orders taken early 2021. one hundred seventyfive Customers told expect internet service speeds fifty Mbit one hundred fifty Mbit latency twenty  forty . one hundred seventysix  December two thousand twentytwo Starlink reached one million subscribers worldwide. one hundred seventyseven The planned large number Starlink satellites criticized astronomers due concerns light pollution one hundred seventyeight one hundred seventynine one hundred eighty brightness Starlink satellites optical radio wavelengths interfering scientific observations. one hundred eightyone  response SpaceX implemented several upgrades Starlink satellites aimed reducing brightness. one hundred eightytwo The large number satellites employed Starlink also creates long term dangers space debris collisions. one hundred eightythree one hundred eightyfour However satellites equipped krypton fueled Hall thrusters allow de orbit end life. They also designed autonomously avoid collisions based uplinked tracking data. one hundred eightyfive  December two thousand twentytwo SpaceX announced Starshield program incorporate military government entity payloads board Starlink derived satellite bus. The Space Development Agency key customer procuring satellites space based missile defense system. one hundred eightysix one hundred eightyseven Other projects  June two thousand fifteen SpaceX announced would sponsor Hyperloop competition would build .   .  mi long subscale test track near SpaceX headquarters competitive events. one hundred eightyeight one hundred eightynine The company held annual competition since 2017. one hundred ninety  collaboration doctors academic researchers SpaceX invited employees participate creation COVID nineteen antibody testing program 2020. As four thousand three hundred employees volunteered provide blood samples resulting peer reviewed scientific paper crediting eight SpaceX employees coauthors suggesting certain level COVID nineteen antibodies may provide lasting protection virus. one hundred ninetyone one hundred ninetytwo  July two thousand eighteen Musk arranged employees build mini submarine assist rescue children stuck flooded cavern Thailand. one hundred ninetythree Richard Stanton leader international rescue diving team urged Musk facilitate construction vehicle back case flooding worsened. one hundred ninetyfour one hundred ninetyfive Engineers SpaceX The Boring Company built mini submarine Falcon nine liquid oxygen transfer tube eight hours personally delivered Thailand. one hundred ninetysix one hundred ninetyseven  time however eight twelve children already rescued using full face masks oxygen anesthesia consequently Thai authorities declined use submarine. one hundred ninetythree Facilities SpaceX headquartered Hawthorne California also serves primary manufacturing plant. one hundred ninetyeight The company operates research major operation Redmond Washington owns test site Texas one hundred ninetynine operates three launch sites another development. SpaceX also operates regional offices Texas Virginia Washington D. C. seventyfive SpaceX incorporated state Delaware. two hundred Headquarters mission control manufacturing refurbishment facilities SpaceX Headquarters located Los Angeles suburb Hawthorne California. The large three story facility originally built Northrop Corporation build Boeing seven hundred fortyseven fuselages one hundred ninetyeight houses SpaceX office space mission control Falcon nine manufacturing facilities. two hundred one The area one largest concentrations space sector headquarters facilities subsidiaries YOU. S. including Boeing McDonnell Douglas main satellite building campuses The Aerospace Corporation Raytheon NASA Jet Propulsion Laboratory United States Space Force Space Systems Command Los Angeles Air Force Base Lockheed Martin BAE Systems Northrop Grumman AECOM etc. large pool aerospace engineers recent college engineering graduates. one hundred ninetyeight SpaceX uses high degree vertical integration production rockets rocket engines. sixteen SpaceX builds rocket engines rocket stages spacecraft principal avionics software house Hawthorne facility unusual space industry. sixteen  January two thousand fifteen SpaceX announced would entering satellite production business global satellite internet business. The first satellite facility thirty zero   two eight hundred two office building located Redmond Washington. As January two thousand seventeen second facility Redmond acquired forty six hundred twentyfive   three 774.  two become research development laboratory satellites. two hundred two  July two thousand sixteen SpaceX acquired additional eight zero   seven hundred forty two office space Irvine California focus satellite communications. two hundred three Development test facilities SpaceX operates Rocket Development Test Facility McGregor Texas. All SpaceX rocket engines tested rocket test stands one hundred ninetynine low altitude VTVL flight testing Falcon nine Grasshopper twenty million one hundred twentytwo thousand thirteen carried McGregor. two hundred four Testing much larger Starship prototypes conducted SpaceX Starbase near Brownsville Texas. two hundred one The company purchased McGregor facilities Beal Aerospace refitted largest test stand Falcon nine engine testing. SpaceX made improvements facility since purchase also extended acreage purchasing adjacent farmland. As October two thousand twelve update McGregor facility seven test stands operated eighteen hours day six days week two hundred five building test stands due increased production company large manifest next several years. two hundred six  addition routine testing Dragon capsules following recovery orbital mission shipped McGregor de fueling cleanup refurbishment reuse future missions. two hundred seven Launch facilities SpaceX operates four orbital launch sites Cape Canaveral Space Force Station Kennedy Space Center Florida Vandenberg Space Force Base California Falcon rockets Starbase near Brownsville Texas Starship. SpaceX indicated see niche four orbital facilities sufficient launch business fill pad. two hundred eight The Vandenberg launch site enables highly inclined orbits sixtysix thousand one hundred fortyfive Cape Canaveral Kennedy enable orbits medium inclination . 555. two hundred nine Larger inclinations including SSO possible Florida overflying Cuba. two hundred ten Before retired Falcon one launches took place Ronald Reagan Ballistic Missile Defense Test Site Omelek Island Marshall Islands. two hundred eleven  April two thousand seven Pentagon approved use Cape Canaveral Space Launch Complex forty SLC forty SpaceX. two hundred twelve The site used since two thousand ten Falcon nine launches mainly low Earth geostationary orbits. The former Launch Complex thirteen Cape Canaveral renamed Landing Zones one two since two thousand fifteen used Falcon nine first stage booster landings. two hundred thirteen Vandenberg Space Launch Complex four SLC  leased military two thousand eleven used payloads polar orbits. The Vandenberg site launch Falcon nine Falcon Heavy vehicles two hundred fourteen launch low inclination orbits. The neighboring SLC  converted Landing Zone four two thousand fifteen booster landings. two hundred fifteen  fourteen April two thousand fourteen SpaceX signed twenty year lease Kennedy Space Center Launch Complex 39A. two hundred sixteen The pad subsequently modified support Falcon nine Falcon Heavy launches. As two thousand twentyfour update pad supports Falcon Heavy launches. SpaceX launched first crewed mission ISS Launch Pad 39A thirty May 2020. two hundred seventeen Pad 39A prepared since two thousand nineteen eventually accommodate Starship launches. With delays launch FAA permits Boca Chica Texas 39A Starship preparation accelerated 2022. two hundred eighteen SpaceX manufactures flies Starship test vehicles SpaceX Starbase Boca Chica near Brownsville Texas announced first plans launch facility August 2014. two hundred nineteen two hundred twenty The Federal Aviation Administration FAA issued permit July 2014. two hundred twentyone SpaceX broke ground new launch facility two thousand fourteen construction ramping latter half two thousand fifteen two hundred twentytwo first suborbital launches facility two thousand nineteen two hundred one orbital launches starting 2023. Some residents Boca Chica Village Brownsville environmental activists criticized site along Starship development program various aspects. two hundred twentythree two hundred twentyfour Contracts SpaceX demonstration actual supply contracts NASA International Space Station ISS technology company developed. SpaceX also certified YOU. S. military launches Evolved Expendable Launch Vehicle class EELV payloads. With approximately thirty missions manifest two thousand eighteen alone SpaceX represented twelve billion contract. seventyfive Cargo ISS  two thousand six SpaceX NASA Commercial Orbital Transportation Services COTS Phase one contract demonstrate cargo delivery International Space Station ISS possible contract option crew transport. two hundred twentyfive Through contract designed NASA provide seed money Space Act Agreements developing new capabilities NASA paid SpaceX three hundred ninetysix million develop cargo configuration Dragon spacecraft SpaceX developed Falcon nine launch vehicle resources. two hundred twentysix These Space Act Agreements shown saved NASA millions dollars development costs making rocket development four hundred ten times less expensive produced NASA alone. two hundred twentyseven  December two thousand ten launch SpaceX COTS Demo Flight one mission SpaceX became first private company successfully launch orbit recover spacecraft. two hundred twentyeight Dragon successfully berthed ISS SpaceX COTS Demo Flight two May two thousand twelve first private spacecraft. two hundred twentynine Commercial Resupply Services CRS series contracts awarded NASA two thousand eight two thousand sixteen delivery cargo supplies International Space Station commercially operated spacecraft. The first CRS contracts signed two thousand eight awarded .  billion SpaceX twelve cargo transport missions covering deliveries 2016. two hundred thirty SpaceX CRS one first twelve planned resupply missions launched October two thousand twelve achieved orbit berthed remained station twenty days entering atmosphere splashing Pacific Ocean. two hundred thirtyone CRS missions flown approximately twice year ISS since.  two thousand fifteen NASA extended Phase one contracts ordering additional three resupply flights SpaceX extended contract total twenty cargo missions ISS. two hundred thirtytwo two hundred thirty two hundred thirtythree The final Dragon one mission SpaceX CRS twenty departed ISS April two thousand twenty Dragon subsequently retired service. A second phase contracts awarded January two thousand sixteen SpaceX one awardees. SpaceX fly nine additional CRS flights upgraded Dragon two spacecraft. two hundred thirtyfour two hundred thirtyfive  March two thousand twenty NASA contracted SpaceX develop Dragon  spacecraft send supplies Lunar Gateway space station. Dragon  launched Falcon Heavy. two hundred thirtysix Crewed SpaceX responsible transportation NASA astronauts ISS. The NASA contracts started part Commercial Crew Development CCDev program aimed developing commercially operated spacecraft capable delivering astronauts ISS. The first contract awarded SpaceX two thousand eleven two hundred thirtyseven two hundred thirtyeight followed another two thousand twelve continue development testing Dragon two spacecraft. two hundred thirtynine  September two thousand fourteen NASA chose SpaceX Boeing two companies would funded develop systems transport YOU. S. crews ISS. two hundred forty SpaceX .  billion complete certify Dragon two 2017. The contracts called least one crewed flight test least one NASA astronaut aboard. Once Crew Dragon received NASA human spaceflight certification contract required SpaceX conduct least two many six crewed missions space station. two hundred forty SpaceX completed first key flight test Crew Dragon spacecraft Pad Abort Test May two thousand fifteen two hundred fortyone successfully conducted full uncrewed test flight early 2019. The capsule docked ISS splashed Atlantic Ocean. two hundred fortytwo  January two thousand twenty SpaceX conducted flight abort test last test flight flying crew Dragon spacecraft fired launch escape engines simulated abort scenario. two hundred fortythree  thirty May two thousand twenty Crew Dragon Demo two mission launched International Space Station NASA astronauts Bob Behnken Doug Hurley first time crewed vehicle launched YOU. S. since two thousand eleven first SpaceX commercial crewed launch ISS. two hundred fortyfour The Crew one mission successfully launched International Space Station sixteen November two thousand twenty NASA astronauts Michael Hopkins Victor Glover Shannon Walker along JAXA astronaut Soichi Noguchi two hundred fortyfive members Expedition sixtyfour crew. two hundred fortysix  twentythree April two thousand twentyone Crew two launched International Space Station NASA astronauts Shane Kimbrough K. Megan McArthur JAXA astronaut Akihiko Hoshide ESA astronaut Thomas Pesquet. two hundred fortyseven The Crew two mission successfully docked twentyfour April 2021. two hundred fortyeight SpaceX also offers paid crewed spaceflights private individuals. The first missions Inspiration4 launched two thousand twentyone behalf Shift4 Payments CEO Jared Isaacman. The mission launched Crew Dragon Resilience Florida Kennedy Space Center Launch Complex 39A atop Falcon nine launch vehicle placed Dragon capsule low Earth orbit ended successfully three days later Resilience splashed Atlantic Ocean. All four crew members received commercial astronaut training SpaceX. The training included lessons orbital mechanics operating microgravity environment stress testing emergency preparedness training mission simulations. two hundred fortynine National defense  two thousand five SpaceX announced awarded Indefinite Delivery Indefinite Quantity IDIQ contract allowing United States Air Force purchase one hundred million worth launches company. two hundred fifty Three years later NASA announced awarded IDIQ Launch Services contract SpaceX one billion depending number missions awarded. two hundred fiftyone  December two thousand twelve SpaceX announced first two launch contracts United States Department Defense DoD. The United States Air Force Space Missile Systems Center awarded SpaceX two EELV class missions Deep Space Climate Observatory DSCOVR Space Test Program two STP two. DSCOVR launched Falcon nine launch vehicle two thousand fifteen STP two launched Falcon Heavy twentyfive June 2019. two hundred fiftytwo The Falcon nine .  certified National Security Space Launch NSSL two thousand fifteen allowing SpaceX contract launch services Air Force payloads classified national security. one hundred fortynine This broke monopoly held since two thousand six United Launch Alliance ULA YOU. S. Air Force launches classified payloads. two hundred fiftythree  April two thousand sixteen YOU. S. Air Force awarded first national security launch SpaceX launch second GPS III satellite .  million. two hundred fiftyfour This approximately forty less estimated cost similar previous missions. two hundred fiftyfive SpaceX also launched third GPS III launch twenty June 2020. two hundred fiftysix  March two thousand eighteen SpaceX secured additional two hundred ninety million contract YOU. S. Air Force launch another three GPS III satellites. two hundred fiftyseven The YOU. S. National Reconnaissance Office NRO also purchased launches SpaceX first taking place one May 2017. two hundred fiftyeight  February two thousand nineteen SpaceX secured two hundred ninetyseven million contract YOU. S. Air Force launch another three national security missions slated launch earlier  2021. two hundred fiftynine  August two thousand twenty YOU. S. Space Force awarded National Security Space Launch NSSL contracts following fiftyseven years. SpaceX contract three hundred sixteen million one launch.  addition SpaceX handle forty YOU. S. military satellite launch requirements period. two hundred sixty SpaceX also designs launches custom military satellites Space Development Agency part new missile defense system low Earth orbit. two hundred sixtyone The constellation would give United States capabilities sense target potentially intercept nuclear missiles hypersonic weapons launched anywhere Earth. two hundred sixtytwo Both China Russia brought concerns United Nations program two hundred sixtythree various organizations warn could destabilizing trigger arms race space. two hundred sixtyfour two hundred sixtyfive  March two thousand twentyfour Reuters reported part .  billion contract signed National Reconnaissance Office two thousand twentyone SpaceX building network hundreds spy satellites. This new network Reuters reported would able operate swarm low orbits. two hundred sixtysix Launch market competition pricing pressure SpaceX low launch prices especially communications satellites flying geostationary transfer orbit GTO resulted market pressure competitors lower prices. sixteen Prior two thousand thirteen openly competed comsat launch market dominated Arianespace flying Ariane five International Launch Services flying Proton. two hundred sixtyseven With published price .  million per launch low Earth orbit Falcon nine rockets least expensive industry. two hundred sixtyeight European satellite operators pushing ESA reduce launch prices Ariane five future Ariane six rockets result competition SpaceX. two hundred sixtynine SpaceX ended United Launch Alliance ULA monopoly YOU. S. military payloads began compete national security launches.  two thousand fifteen anticipating slump domestic military spy launches ULA stated would go business unless commercial satellite launch orders. two hundred seventy  end ULA announced major restructuring processes workforce decrease launch costs half. two hundred seventyone two hundred seventytwo Congressional testimony SpaceX two thousand seventeen suggested NASA Space Act Agreement process setting high level requirement cargo transport space station leaving details industry allowed SpaceX design develop Falcon nine rocket substantially lower cost. According NASA independently verified numbers SpaceX total development cost Falcon nine rocket including Falcon one rocket estimated three hundred ninety million.  two thousand eleven NASA estimated would cost agency four billion develop rocket like Falcon nine booster based upon NASA traditional contracting processes ten times. two hundred twentyseven  May two thousand twenty NASA administrator Jim Bridenstine remarked thanks NASA investments SpaceX United States seventy commercial launch market major improvement since two thousand twelve commercial launches country. two hundred seventythree As two thousand twentyfour SpaceX operates Rideshare Bandwagon mid inclination programs. This provides additional competition small satellite launchers. two hundred seventyfour Corporate affairs Board directors Leadership changes  November two thousand twentytwo company announced COO Gwynne Shotwell vice president Mark Juncosa would oversee Starbase Texas launch facility along Omead Afshar time oversaw operations Tesla Texas. Shyamal Patel senior director operations site would shift Cape Canaveral site. CNBC reported executive moves demonstrated sense urgency within company get Starship flying. two hundred eightyseven two hundred eightyeight two hundred eightynine Workplace culture According former NASA deputy administrator Lori Garver company overall male dominated employee culture similar spaceflight industry general. two hundred ninety  December two thousand twentyone claims workplace sexual harassment five former SpaceX employees ranging interns full engineers published. two hundred ninetyone The former employees claimed experienced unwanted advances uncomfortable interactions. two hundred ninetytwo Additionally accounts included claims culture sexual harassment existing company one complaints made executives managers human resources officers went largely unaddressed. two hundred ninetythree  May two thousand twentytwo Business Insider article alleged Musk engaged sexual misconduct SpaceX flight attendant private jet two thousand sixteen citing anonymous friend flight attendant. two hundred ninetyfour  response employees collaborated open letter condemning Elon harmful Twitter behavior. two hundred ninetyfive  also asks company clearly define SpaceX asshole zero tolerance policies says unequally enforced one employee next. The next day Gwynne Shotwell announced employees involved letter terminated claimed unsponsored unsolicited surveys sent employees work day felt pressured sign letter. two hundred ninetysix The company also described work culture pushes employees work excessively described fostering burnout culture. two hundred ninetyseven According memo Blue Origin rival aerospace company two hundred ninetyeight two hundred ninetynine three hundred SpaceX expected long work hours work weekends limited use holidays. two hundred ninetyseven References Delaware Business Search File three million five hundred thousand eight hundred eight Space Exploration Technologies Corp. Delaware Department State Division Corporations. Archived original twenty September two thousand sixteen. Retrieved one February two thousand twentytwo. Who Elon Musk made big Business Economy finance news German perspective. Deutsche Welle. twentyseven May 2020. Archived original twentyeight May two thousand twenty. Retrieved twentyeight May two thousand twenty. Gwynne Shotwell Executive Profile Biography. Bloomberg L. P. Archived original sixteen July two thousand nineteen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. b c Maidenberg Micah Driebusch Corrie Jin Berber seventeen August two thousand twentythree. A Rare Look Into Finances Elon Musk Secretive SpaceX. The Wall Street Journal. Archived original seventeen August two thousand twentythree. Retrieved seventeen August two thousand twentythree. Maidenberg Micah Higgins Tim five September two thousand twentythree. Elon Musk Borrowed one Billion From SpaceX Same Month Twitter Acquisition. The Wall Street Journal. Archived original six September two thousand twentythree. Retrieved six September two thousand twentythree. Complaint Declaratory Injunctive Relief PDF. United States District Court Southern District Texas. Archived PDF original twenty September two thousand twentythree. Retrieved twenty September two thousand twentythree via courtlistener. com. b Order Review FCC twentythree one hundred five PDF. Federal Communications Commission. twelve December 2023. Archived PDF original twentyfour December two thousand twentythree. Retrieved twentynine March two thousand twentyfour. After auction SpaceX assigned winning bids wholly owned subsidiary Starlink. McDowell Jonathan eighteen May two thousand twentytwo. Starlink Launch Statistics. planet4589. Archived original twentyone April two thousand twentyone. Retrieved twentyseven June two thousand twentythree. SpaceX. SpaceX. Archived original seven March two thousand eleven. Retrieved twentyseven June two thousand twentythree. Sheetz Michael LaRocco Lori Ann thirteen December two thousand twentythree. SpaceX valuation climbs one hundred eighty billion. CNBC. Archived original twentysix December two thousand twentythree. Retrieved twentysix December two thousand twentythree. Krietzberg Ian fourteen December two thousand twentythree. One Tesla Chief Elon Musk ventures worth  one hundred eighty billion. TheStreet. Archived original twentysix December two thousand twentythree. Retrieved twentysix December two thousand twentythree. Zubrin Robert fourteen May two thousand nineteen. The Case Space How Revolution Spaceflight Opens  Future Limitless Possibility. Amherst New York Prometheus Books. ISBN nine hundred seventyeight one sixtythree thousand three hundred eightyeight five hundred thirtyfour nine. OCLC one billion fiftythree million five hundred seventytwo thousand six hundred sixtysix. Mars Society twentythree August two thousand one. The Mars Society Inc. Fourth International Convention PDF. Mars Society. Archived PDF original thirty March two thousand twentythree. Retrieved twentythree August two thousand twentyone. Musk Elon thirty May two thousand nine. Risky Business. IEEE Spectrum. Archived original twentythree February two thousand seventeen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. Cowing Keith thirty August two thousand one. Millionaires billionaires secret sending humans Mars. SPACEREF. Retrieved one March two thousand twentytwo. dead link b c e Chaikin Andrew January two thousand twelve.  SpaceX Changing Rocket Equation. Air Space Smithsonian. Archived original twentythree February two thousand seventeen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. b c Vance Ashlee fourteen May two thousand fifteen. Elon Musk space dream almost killed Tesla. Bloomberg L. P. Archived original eleven February two thousand eighteen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. Berger Eric two thousand twentyone. Liftoff. William Morrow Company. p. . ISBN nine hundred seventyeight zero six two hundred ninetyseven thousand nine hundred ninetyseven one. Berger Eric two thousand twentyone. Liftoff. William Morrow Company. ISBN nine hundred seventyeight zero six two hundred ninetyseven thousand nine hundred ninetyseven one. Belfiore Michael one September two thousand nine. Behind Scenes With World Most Ambitious Rocket Makers. Popular Mechanics. Archived original thirteen December two thousand sixteen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. Podcast SpaceX COO  Prospects For Starship Launcher Archived ten June two thousand twenty Wayback Machine. Aviation Week Irene Klotz twentyseven May 2020. Retrieved ten June 2020. Berger Eric two thousand twentyone. Liftoff. William Morrow Company. p. . ISBN nine hundred seventyeight zero six two hundred ninetyseven thousand nine hundred ninetyseven one. Space Exploration Technologies Corporation. SpaceX. Archived original twentythree June two thousand thirteen. Retrieved fifteen December two thousand twelve. Maney Kevin seventeen June two thousand five. Private sector enticing public final frontier. USA Today. Archived original nineteen May two thousand twelve. Retrieved fourteen March two thousand twentyone. b Hoffman Carl twentytwo May two thousand seven. Elon Musk  Betting His Fortune Mission Beyond Earth Orbit. Wired. Archived original fourteen November two thousand twelve. Retrieved fourteen March two thousand fourteen. Commercial Market Assessment Crew Cargo Systems PDF. nasa. gov. NASA. twentyseven April 2011. p. . Archived PDF original seven December two thousand fourteen. Retrieved ten June two thousand fifteen. SpaceX publicly indicated development cost Falcon nine launch vehicle approximately three hundred million. Additionally approximately ninety million spent developing Falcon one launch vehicle contribute extent Falcon nine total three hundred ninety million. NASA verified costs. Berger Eric two thousand twentyone. Liftoff. William Morrow Company. p. 215. ISBN nine hundred seventyeight zero six two hundred ninetyseven thousand nine hundred ninetyseven one. Ray Justin twenty January two thousand five. Cape launch site could host new commercial rocket fleet. spaceflightnow. com. Archived original fourteen October two thousand twentythree. Retrieved seven October two thousand twentythree. Berger Eric two thousand twentyone. Liftoff. William Morrow Company. . 109110. ISBN nine hundred seventyeight zero six two hundred ninetyseven thousand nine hundred ninetyseven one. Berger Brian three October two thousand five. Kistler Teeters Brink After Main Investor Withdraws Support. SpaceNews. Archived original three April two thousand twentyfour. Retrieved seven October two thousand twentythree. Belfiore Michael eighteen January two thousand five. Race Next Space Prize Ignites. Wired. Archived original twelve October two thousand eight. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. Berger Eric eleven August two thousand twentyone. This probably Blue Origin keeps protesting NASA lunar lander award. Ars Technica. Archived original thirty December two thousand twentyone. Retrieved thirty December two thousand twentyone. Falcon one Reaches Space But Loses Control Destroyed  Entry. Satnews. com. twentyone March 2007. Archived original twentyeight September 2007. Graham Warwick Guy Norris Blue Sky Thinking DARPA fifty Aviation Week Space Technology one thousand eight hundred twentyfive Aug two thousand eight p. . Levin Steve twelve January two thousand twentytwo. Elon Musk man behind Tesla Paypal speaks packed crowd CSUB. The Bakersfield Californian. Archived original twelve January two thousand twentytwo. Retrieved twelve January two thousand twentytwo. Berger Eric two thousand twentyone. Liftoff. William Morrow Company. . 178182. ISBN nine hundred seventyeight zero six two hundred ninetyseven thousand nine hundred ninetyseven one. Berger Eric two thousand twentyone. Liftoff. William Morrow Company. p. 216. ISBN nine hundred seventyeight zero six two hundred ninetyseven thousand nine hundred ninetyseven one. Berger Eric two thousand twentyone. Liftoff. William Morrow Company. . 217221. ISBN nine hundred seventyeight zero six two hundred ninetyseven thousand nine hundred ninetyseven one. Graham William twenty December two thousand seventeen. SpaceX fifty From taming Falcon one achieving cadence Falcon nine. NASASpaceFlight. com. Archived original thirtyone December two thousand twenty. Retrieved sixteen March two thousand twentyone. Bergin Chris fifteen January two thousand nine. Planetspace officially protest NASA CRS selection. NSF. Retrieved twentytwo August two thousand twentythree. Berger Eric two thousand twentyone. Liftoff. William Morrow Company. p. 222. ISBN nine hundred seventyeight zero six two hundred ninetyseven thousand nine hundred ninetyseven one. David Leonard nine September two thousand five. SpaceX tackles reusable heavy launch vehicle. MSNBC. Archived original twentyone May two thousand twentyone. Retrieved fourteen March two thousand twentyone. b This article incorporates text source public domain David J. Frankel twentysix April two thousand ten. Minutes NAC Commercial Space Committee PDF. NASA. Archived PDF original thirteen March two thousand seventeen. Retrieved twentyfour June two thousand seventeen. b Private space capsule maiden voyage ends splash. BBC News. eight December 2010. Archived original fifteen November two thousand sixteen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. Chow Denise eight December two thousand ten. Q A SpaceX CEO Elon Musk Master Private Space Dragons. Space. com. Archived original eighteen August two thousand seventeen. Retrieved twentyfour June two thousand seventeen. Chow Denise eighteen April two thousand eleven. Private Spaceship Builders Split Nearly two hundred seventy Million NASA Funds. Space. com. Archived original thirtyone December two thousand eleven. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. b Koenigsmann Hans seventeen January two thousand eighteen. Statement . Hans Koeningsmann Vice President Build Flight Reliability Space Exploration Technologies Corp. SpaceX PDF. Archived original PDF twentythree September 2018. Melby Caleb twelve March two thousand twelve. How Elon Musk Became A Billionaire Twice Over. Forbes. Archived original six March two thousand seventeen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. Elon Musk Anticipates Third IPO Three Years With SpaceX. Bloomberg L. P. eleven February 2012. Archived original twentyone July two thousand sixteen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. Watts Jane twentyseven April two thousand twelve. Elon Musk Why SpaceX Has Right Stuff Win Space Race. CNBC. Archived original sixteen December two thousand sixteen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. b Private SpaceX rocket blasts space station Cargo ship reaches orbit nine minutes launch. CBC News. The Canadian Press. twentytwo May 2012. Archived original thirteen March two thousand seventeen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. Privately held SpaceX Worth Nearly .  Billion twenty Share Double Its Pre Mission Secondary Market Value Following Historic Success International Space Station. privco. com. seven June 2012. Archived original six August two thousand seventeen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. Bilton Ricardo ten June two thousand twelve. SpaceX worth skyrockets .  billion successful mission. VentureBeat. Archived original six March two thousand sixteen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. SpaceX overview second market. SecondMarket. Archived original seventeen December 2012. b Fernholz Tim. The complete visual history SpaceX single minded pursuit rocket reusability. Quartz. Archived original twelve March two thousand twentyone. Retrieved sixteen March two thousand twentyone. de Selding Peter B. twelve January two thousand fifteen. Arianespace SpaceX Battled Draw two thousand fourteen Launch Contracts. SpaceNews. Archived original thirteen January two thousand fifteen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. Svitak Amy eleven February two thousand fourteen. Arianespace  ESA  Need Help. Aviation Week. Archived original five March two thousand seventeen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. de Selding Peter B. fourteen April two thousand fourteen. Satellite Operators Press ESA Reduction Ariane Launch Costs. SpaceNews. Archived original two August two thousand twentythree. Retrieved twentyfour November two thousand twentytwo. Petersen Melody twentyfive November two thousand fourteen. SpaceX may upset firm monopoly launching Air Force satellites. Los Angeles Times. Archived original twentyone April two thousand seventeen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. Air Force budget reveals much SpaceX undercuts launch prices. Ars Technica. Archived original seventeen January two thousand eighteen. Retrieved twentynine March two thousand eighteen. Berger Brian twenty January two thousand fifteen. SpaceX Confirms Google Investment. SpaceNews. Archived original twenty February two thousand twentythree. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. Kang Cecilia Davenport Christian nine June two thousand fifteen. SpaceX founder files government provide Internet service space. The Washington Post. Archived original twentythree February two thousand seventeen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. Masunaga Samantha Petersen Melody two September two thousand sixteen. SpaceX rocket exploded instant. Figuring involves mountain data. Los Angeles Times. Archived original nineteen February two thousand seventeen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. Musk Elon twentyone December two thousand fifteen. Background tonight launch. SpaceX. Archived original eight March two thousand seventeen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. Wright Robert nine April two thousand sixteen. SpaceX rocket lands drone ship. CNBC. Archived original twentyone September two thousand nineteen. Retrieved sixteen March two thousand twentyone. de Selding Peter B. five October two thousand sixteen. SpaceX Shotwell Falcon nine inquiry discounts reused rockets Silicon Valley test fail ethos. SpaceNews. Archived original eighteen December two thousand seventeen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. Santana Marco six September two thousand sixteen. SpaceX customer vows rebuild satellite explosion aftermath. Orlando Sentinel. Archived original sixteen February two thousand seventeen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. Grush Loren five November two thousand sixteen. Elon Musk says SpaceX finally knows caused latest rocket failure. The Verge. Archived original nineteen February two thousand seventeen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. Anomaly Updates. SpaceX. one September 2016. Archived original sixteen February two thousand seventeen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. b Davenport Christian thirty March two thousand seventeen. Elon Musk SpaceX makes history launching flight proven rocket. The Washington Post. Archived original thirtyone March two thousand seventeen. Retrieved thirtyone March two thousand seventeen. SpaceX successfully launches lands recycled rocket. NBC News. Archived original thirtyone March two thousand seventeen. Retrieved thirtyone March two thousand seventeen. SpaceX  Now One World Most Valuable Privately Held Companies. The New York Times. twentyseven July 2017. Archived original twentynine November two thousand seventeen. Retrieved sixteen November two thousand seventeen. As SpaceX steamroller surges European rocket industry vows resist. twenty July 2018. Archived original twenty July two thousand eighteen. Retrieved twentyone July two thousand eighteen. spacexcmsadmin twentyseven November two thousand twelve. Company. SpaceX. Archived original twentytwo February two thousand seventeen. Retrieved twentynine March two thousand eighteen. b c Company SpaceX. SpaceX. Archived original twentytwo February two thousand seventeen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. Hughes Tim thirteen July two thousand seventeen. Statement Tim Hughes Senior Vice President Global Business Government Affairs Space Exploration Technologies Corp. SpaceX PDF. Archived PDF original twentythree October 2017. Agenda Item No. nine City Hawthorne City Council Agenda Bill Archived twentyfour February two thousand twentyone Wayback Machine eleven September two thousand eighteen Planning Community Development Department City Hawthorne. Retrieved thirteen September 2018. Nelson Laura J. twentyone November two thousand seventeen. Elon Musk tunneling company wants dig L. A. Los Angeles Times. Archived original twentyseven March two thousand eighteen. Retrieved thirteen September two thousand eighteen. Nothing Boring About Elon Musk Newly Revealed Underground Tunnel. cbslocal. com. eleven May 2018. Archived original three December two thousand eighteen. Retrieved two February two thousand nineteen. b Copeland Rob seventeen December two thousand eighteen. Elon Musk New Boring . Faced Questions Over SpaceX Financial Ties. The Wall Street Journal. Archived original eighteen December two thousand eighteen. Retrieved eighteen December two thousand eighteen. When Boring . earlier year spun firm ninety equity went Mr. Musk rest early employees... The Boring . since given equity SpaceX compensation help... six Boring stock based value land time resources contributed since creation company. Sheetz Michael twentyone February two thousand twenty. SpaceX looking raise two hundred fifty million valuing Elon Musk space company thirtysix billion. CNBC. Archived original twentynine May two thousand twenty. Retrieved fifteen May two thousand twenty. SpaceX valuation rises .  billion investors look satellite opportunity. CNBC. thirtyone May 2019. Archived original eleven June two thousand nineteen. Retrieved seventeen June two thousand nineteen. Cao Sissi ten March two thousand twenty. As SpaceX Reaches thirtysix Billion Valuation Elon Musk Clarifies Starlink IPO Rumors. Observer. Archived original seventeen June two thousand twenty. Retrieved twentynine May two thousand twenty. Elon Musk SpaceX raises .  billion funding. Reuters. nineteen August 2020. Archived original twenty August two thousand twenty. Retrieved twenty August two thousand twenty. Wattles Jackie. SpaceX fortysix billion unicorn. CNN Business. Archived original twenty August two thousand twenty. Retrieved twenty August two thousand twenty. b Sheetz Michael sixteen February two thousand twentyone. Elon Musk SpaceX raised eight hundred fifty million jumping valuation seventyfour billion. CNBC. Archived original seventeen February two thousand twentyone. Retrieved seventeen February two thousand twentyone. b Foust Jeff fifteen April two thousand twentyone. SpaceX adds latest funding round. SpaceNews. Archived original twenty June two thousand twentyone. Retrieved fifteen April two thousand twentyone. Sheetz Michael eight October two thousand twentyone. Elon Musk SpaceX hits one hundred billion valuation secondary share sale. CNBC. Archived original twentynine October two thousand twentyone. Retrieved thirty October two thousand twentyone. Foust Jeff sixteen April two thousand twentyone. NASA selects SpaceX develop crewed lunar lander. SpaceNews. Archived original twentythree May two thousand twentyone. Retrieved eighteen April two thousand twentyone. Novet Jordan thirteen May two thousand twentyone. Google wins cloud deal Elon Musk SpaceX Starlink internet connectivity. CNBC. Archived original thirteen May two thousand twentyone. Retrieved fourteen May two thousand twentyone. SpaceX raises another two hundred fifty million equity lifts total two billion two thousand twentytwo. CNBC. five August 2022. Archived original nine August two thousand twentytwo. Retrieved nine August two thousand twentytwo. Howell Elizabeth twelve July two thousand twentyone. Elon Musk unveils SpaceX newest drone ship rocket landings sea. Space. Archived original twentyseven August two thousand twentyone. Retrieved seven February two thousand twentytwo. Whittington Mark R. nine January two thousand twentytwo. SpaceX Elon Musk going carbon capture business. The Hill. Nexstar Media Group. Archived original seven July two thousand twentytwo. Retrieved seven July two thousand twentytwo. Chiland Elijah twentyfour January two thousand twentytwo. SpaceX Has Big Projects Works two thousand twentytwo. Los Angeles Business Journal. Archived original seven July two thousand twentytwo. Retrieved seven July two thousand twentytwo. Clifford Catherine eight February two thousand twentyone. The Elon Musk one hundred million prize money carbon capture innovation. CNBC. Archived original seven July two thousand twentytwo. Retrieved seven July two thousand twentytwo. Chappell Bill eight February two thousand twentyone. Elon Musk Funds one hundred Million XPrize For Pursuit  New Carbon Removal Ideas. NPR. Archived original twentyfour February two thousand twentyone. Retrieved seven July two thousand twentytwo. Europe eyes Musk SpaceX replace Russian rockets. CNBC. Reuters. Archived original twelve August two thousand twentytwo. Retrieved twelve August two thousand twentytwo. Sheetz Amanda Macias Michael one June two thousand twentythree. Pentagon awards SpaceX Ukraine contract Starlink satellite internet. CNBC. Archived original fifteen September two thousand twentythree. Retrieved fifteen September two thousand twentythree. b Wall Mike four January two thousand twentythree. sixtyone rocket launches SpaceX celebrates record breaking two thousand twentytwo. Space. com. Archived original eight January two thousand twentythree. Retrieved eight January two thousand twentythree. SpaceX thirty December two thousand twentytwo. Falcon nine launched ImageSatIntl EROS C three mission orbit overnight completing SpaceX 61st final launch two thousand twentytwo nearly double record thirtyone launches set last year Tweet. Retrieved eight January two thousand twentythree via Twitter. Carter Tom. Elon Musk SpaceX buying company makes parachutes spacecraft .  million. Business Insider. Archived original thirty November two thousand twentythree. Retrieved thirty November two thousand twentythree. Peterson Becky twentyeight November two thousand twentythree. SpaceX Acquires Parachute Maker Pioneer Aerospace .  Million. The Information. Archived original eighteen January two thousand twentyfour. Retrieved eighteen January two thousand twentyfour. Wattles Jackie eleven January two thousand nineteen. SpaceX lay ten workers. CNN. Archived original sixteen July 2019. Steve Ganyard Kekatos Steve twenty April two thousand twentythree. Why SpaceX Starship rocket matters even self destruction. ABC News. Archived original twentyeight January two thousand twentyfour. Retrieved twentyseven January two thousand twentyfour. b Mike Wall. SpaceX push envelope 3rd Starship test flight Archived seven March two thousand twentyfour Wayback Machine Space. com. Retrieved seven March 2024. b Starship Service Earth Orbit Moon Mars Beyond Archived twentytwo May two thousand twenty Wayback Machine Spacex. com. 2024. Retrieved seven March 2024. Olson Emily Archie Ayana twenty April two thousand twentythree. SpaceX massive rocket Starship explodes four minutes liftoff. NPR. Archived original twenty April two thousand twentythree. Retrieved twenty April two thousand twentythree. Berger Eric twenty April two thousand twentythree.  Was Starship launch failure success. Ars Technica. Archived original twentyone April two thousand twentythree. Retrieved fifteen November two thousand twentythree. Wattles Jackie Danya Gainor twentynine April two thousand twentythree. Starship could ready launch six eight weeks Elon Musk says. CNN. Archived original eleven November two thousand twentythree. Retrieved eleven November two thousand twentythree. Wattles Jackie Fisher Kristin nineteen October two thousand twentythree. SpaceX slams regulatory headwinds holding Starship risking  dominance space. CNN. Archived original eleven November two thousand twentythree. Retrieved eleven November two thousand twentythree. SpaceX Starship Launch Ends Explosion. The New York Times. eighteen November 2023. Archived original three April two thousand twentyfour. Retrieved nineteen November two thousand twentythree. SpaceX poised launch twentytwo Starlink satellites early November nineteen. Space. com. eighteen November 2023. Archived original nineteen November two thousand twentythree. Retrieved nineteen November two thousand twentythree. SpaceX launches giant new rocket pair explosions ends second test flight. The Hindu. eighteen November 2023. Archived original nineteen November two thousand twentythree. Retrieved nineteen November two thousand twentythree. Thorpe Vanessa nineteen November two thousand twentythree. Rows rockets blow Elon Musk firms endure turbulent weekend. The Guardian. Archived original nineteen November two thousand twentythree. Retrieved nineteen November two thousand twentythree. Wall Mike thirteen March two thousand twentyfour. FAA grants license SpaceX March fourteen Starship launch. Space. com. Archived original three April two thousand twentyfour. Retrieved twentyone March two thousand twentyfour. published Tariq Malik four June two thousand twentyfour. SpaceX lands FAA license next Starship megarocket launch June six. Space. com. Retrieved five June two thousand twentyfour. b Chang Kenneth thirty May two thousand twenty. SpaceX Lifts NASA Astronauts Orbit Launching New Era Spaceflight The trip space station first American soil since two thousand eleven space shuttles retired. The New York Times. Archived original ten August two thousand twenty. Retrieved thirtyone May two thousand twenty. Wattles Jackie thirty May two thousand twenty. SpaceX Falcon nine launches two NASA astronauts space CNN. CNN. Archived original thirtyone May two thousand twenty. Retrieved thirtyone May two thousand twenty. SpaceX NASA Dragon Demo two launch All questions answered. The Indian Express. two June 2020. Archived original three June two thousand twenty. Retrieved two June two thousand twenty. Patel Neel. SpaceX operates world biggest commercial satellite network. MIT Technology Review. Archived original six October two thousand twentythree. Retrieved nineteen May two thousand twentyfour. McDowell Jonathan nineteen May two thousand twentyfour. Starlink Launch Statistics. Jonathan Space Pages. Archived original seventeen May two thousand twentyfour. Retrieved nineteen May two thousand twentyfour. Foust Jeff nine August two thousand twentyone. SpaceX acquire Swarm Technologies. SpaceNews. Archived original twelve August two thousand twentyone. Retrieved nine May two thousand twentythree. Shepardson David one December two thousand twentytwo. SpaceX gets YOU. S. approval deploy seven five hundred satellites. Reuters. Archived original two December two thousand twentytwo. Retrieved two December two thousand twentytwo. b NASA SpaceX Successfully Launches Falcon one Orbit. nasa. gov. twentyeight September 2008. Archived original three September two thousand twentyone. Retrieved thirty December two thousand twentyone. Kenneth Chang twentyfive May two thousand twelve. Space X Capsule Docks Space Station. The New York Times. Archived original nine August two thousand twentyone. Retrieved twentyfive May two thousand twelve. SpaceX  Another First Recovers six Million Nose Cone From Reused Falcon nine. Fortune. Archived original twelve May two thousand seventeen. Retrieved two May two thousand seventeen. spacexcmsadmin twentynine January two thousand sixteen. Zuma mission. SpaceX. Archived original twentysix November two thousand thirteen. Retrieved four June two thousand seventeen. Burghardt Thomas twentyfive July two thousand nineteen. Starhopper successfully conducts debut Boca Chica Hop. NASASpaceFlight. com. Archived original twentysix July two thousand nineteen. Retrieved one January two thousand twentyone. Clark Stephen. SpaceX reuse payload fairing first time November eleven launch Spaceflight Now. Archived original five December two thousand twenty. Retrieved six May two thousand twentytwo. SpaceX Launches. The New York Times. thirty May 2020. Archived original thirty May two thousand twenty. Retrieved thirty May two thousand twenty. SpaceX 1st Crew Dragon astronauts docks space station historic rendezvous. Space. com. thirtyone May 2020. Archived original three June two thousand twenty. Retrieved two June two thousand twenty. Hennessy Paul twentyfive January two thousand twentyone. SpaceX launches record number spacecraft cosmic rideshare program. NBC News. Archived original twentyeight February two thousand twentyone. Retrieved twentysix January two thousand twentyone. SpaceX launches third astronaut crew first used Crew Dragon capsule. The Verge. twentythree April 2021. Archived original twentythree April two thousand twentyone. Retrieved twentythree April two thousand twentyone. Dent Steve fifteen June two thousand twentyone. SpaceX cleared launch reused rockets national security missions. Archived original seventeen June two thousand twentyone. Retrieved seventeen June two thousand twentyone. SpaceX makes history first civilian spaceflight. NBC. sixteen September 2021. Archived original nineteen September two thousand twentyone. Retrieved nineteen September two thousand twentyone. Gorman Steve nineteen September two thousand twentyone. SpaceX capsule world first civilian orbital crew returns safely. Reuters. Archived original nineteen September two thousand twentyone. Retrieved nineteen September two thousand twentyone. Most consecutive successful orbital launches rocket model. Guinness World Records. twentyone April 2022. Archived original twentytwo April two thousand twentytwo. Retrieved twentytwo April two thousand twentytwo. First civilian crew launches mission International Space Station. NBC News. Archived original five May two thousand twentytwo. Retrieved six May two thousand twentytwo. Soyuz YOU Holding Multiple World Records. The Space Techie. four July 2021. Archived original twenty October two thousand twentytwo. Retrieved twenty October two thousand twentytwo. Amos Jonathan twenty April two thousand twentythree. SpaceX Starship Elon Musk big rocket explodes test flight. BBC News. Archived original twenty April two thousand twentythree. Retrieved twenty April two thousand twentythree. Amos Jonathan six August two thousand twentyone. Biggest ever rocket assembled briefly Texas. BBC News. Archived original eleven August two thousand twentyone. Retrieved twentyfive April two thousand twentythree. Magazine Smithsonian Sullivan Will. Starship Reaches Orbit Third Test Flight Success SpaceX Future Lunar Travel. Smithsonian Magazine. Archived original twentynine March two thousand twentyfour. Retrieved nine April two thousand twentyfour. SpaceX set record breaking rocket launch Friday. Digital Trends. eleven April 2024. Archived original twelve April two thousand twentyfour. Retrieved thirteen April two thousand twentyfour. Falcon nine Overview. SpaceX. 2011. Archived original ten February two thousand seven. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. Falcon nine Falcon Heavy. Archived original twentyone July two thousand twenty. Retrieved three February two thousand twentyone. The .  design constantly improved upon time leading different sub versions Blocks. The initial design flying maiden flight thus referred Block . The final design largely stayed static since two thousand eighteen Block five variant. Falcon Heavy Overview. Space. com. 2011. Archived original five October two thousand eleven. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. Lindsey Clark four January two thousand thirteen. NewSpace flights two thousand thirteen. NewSpace Watch. Archived original twentysix May two thousand thirteen. Retrieved three January two thousand thirteen. spacexcmsadmin fifteen November two thousand twelve. Falcon Heavy. SpaceX. Archived original six April two thousand seventeen. Retrieved five April two thousand seventeen. b This article incorporates text source public domain Air Force Space Missile Systems Center Certifies SpaceX National Security Space Missions. USAF. twentysix May 2015. Archived original one March two thousand seventeen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. Erwin Sandra twentyone September two thousand nineteen. Air Force certified Falcon Heavy national security launch work needed meet required orbits. SpaceNews. Archived original twentyseven April two thousand twentyone. Retrieved twentytwo September two thousand nineteen. SpaceX Missions Summary. Archived original twentytwo June two thousand twentyone. Retrieved six June two thousand twentyone. Total Mission Counter. Archived original twentytwo June two thousand twentyone. Retrieved six June two thousand twentyone. Gebhardt Chris twentynine September two thousand seventeen. The Moon Mars around Earth Musk updates BFR architecture plans. Archived original one October two thousand seventeen. Retrieved sixteen May two thousand twenty. Elon Musk says moon mission dangerous SpaceX first passenger scared. CBS News. eighteen September 2018. Archived original twentyseven November two thousand eighteen. Retrieved two February two thousand nineteen. b O Callaghan Jonathan thirtyone July two thousand nineteen. The wild physics Elon Musk methane guzzling super rocket. Wired . Archived original twentytwo February two thousand twentyone. Retrieved twentyone April two thousand twentyone. b Falcon one Flight Three Press Kit PDF. SpaceX. Archived original PDF one October two thousand eight. Retrieved thirty September two thousand eight. b Falcon nine Launch Vehicle Payload User Guide two thousand nine PDF. SpaceX. 2009. Archived original PDF three May two thousand twelve. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. Bergin Chris thirty May two thousand fourteen. SpaceX lifts lid Dragon  crew spacecraft. NASAspaceflight. com. Archived original thirtyone May two thousand fourteen. Retrieved thirty May two thousand fourteen. Falcon nine User Guide PDF. Archived original PDF twenty February two thousand nineteen. Retrieved twentyfive February two thousand nineteen. Encyclopedia Astronautica Kestrel. Archived original sixteen December two thousand thirteen. Retrieved twentytwo June two thousand twentyone. Berger Eric seven March two thousand nineteen. SpaceX Dragon capsule survived greatest test returning Earth. Ars Technica. Archived original thirty December two thousand twentyone. Retrieved thirty December two thousand twentyone. SpaceX performs first test Raptor engine. SpaceNews. twentysix September 2016. Archived original twenty February two thousand twentythree. Retrieved twentyeight April two thousand seventeen. Big News SpaceX Starhopper Test Vehicle Completes First Free Flight. twentysix July 2019. Archived original eleven August two thousand nineteen. Retrieved eleven August two thousand nineteen. Thompson Amy five December two thousand twenty. Tissue chips organoids SpaceX launching lots science space NASA Sunday. Space. com. Archived original twentysix December two thousand twentyone. Retrieved twentysix December two thousand twentyone. This article incorporates text source public domain Potter Sean twentyseven March two thousand twenty. NASA Awards Artemis Contract Gateway Logistics Services. NASA. Archived original twentyseven March two thousand twenty. Retrieved twentyeight March two thousand twenty. Dragon  revealed NASA ties SpaceX Lunar Gateway supply contract. NASA Spaceflight. twentyseven March 2020. Archived original twentyeight March two thousand twenty. Retrieved twentyeight March two thousand twenty. Howell Elizabeth ten June two thousand twenty. New SpaceX spacesuits get five star rating NASA astronauts. Space. com. Retrieved four May two thousand twentyfour. Updates. SpaceX. Retrieved four May two thousand twentyfour. Simberg Rand eight February two thousand twelve. Elon Musk SpaceX Reusable Rocket Plans. Popular Mechanics. Archived original twentyfour June two thousand seventeen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. SpaceX four February two thousand fifteen Elon Musk Names SpaceX Drone Ships Honor Sci  Legend archived original two June two thousand twenty retrieved thirtyone May two thousand twenty SpaceX nine September two thousand twentytwo. Starlink Services LLC RDOF AFR For Public Inspection. Federal Communications Commission. Archived original nineteen October two thousand twentytwo. Retrieved twentynine March two thousand twentyfour. Starlink Services LLC wholly owned subsidiary Space Exploration Technologies Corp. de Selding Peter B. nineteen January two thousand fifteen. SpaceX  Build four four hundred twentyfive Broadband Satellites Seattle. SpaceNews. Archived original nineteen January two thousand fifteen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. Falcon nine launches first Starlink mission heaviest payload launch SpaceX date. NASASpaceFlight. com. twentythree May 2019. Archived original three June two thousand nineteen. Retrieved four July two thousand nineteen. Sheetz Michael twentyseven October two thousand twenty. SpaceX prices Starlink satellite internet service ninetynine per month according e mail. CNBC. Archived original four February two thousand twentyone. Retrieved twentyfive December two thousand twentyone. SpaceX opens Starlink satellite Internet pre orders public. Engadget. ten February 2021. Archived original ten February two thousand twentyone. Retrieved ten February two thousand twentyone. O Callaghan Jonathan twentyseven October two thousand twenty. SpaceX Reveals Monthly Cost  Starlink Internet  Its Better Than Nothing Beta. Forbes. Archived original seventeen November two thousand twenty. Retrieved thirty October two thousand twenty. SpaceX nineteen December two thousand twentytwo. Starlink one zero zero active subscribers Tweet via Twitter. Hall Shannon June two thousand nineteen. After SpaceX Starlink Launch Fear Satellites That Outnumber All Visible Stars. The New York Times. Archived original twentyone August two thousand twenty. Retrieved three June two thousand nineteen. The unexpected brightness new satellites could ruin night sky. The Economist. thirty May 2019. Archived original seventeen November two thousand twenty. Retrieved three June two thousand nineteen. SpaceX Starlink Could Change The Night Sky Forever And Astronomers Are Not Happy. Forbes. Archived original seventeen November two thousand twenty. Retrieved three June two thousand nineteen. Will Elon Musk Starlink satellites harm astronomy Here know. National Geographic. twentynine May 2019. Archived original nine March two thousand twentyone. Retrieved twelve March two thousand twentyone. SpaceX twentyeight April two thousand twenty. Astronomy Discussion National Academy Sciences. Archived original sixteen May two thousand twentyone. Retrieved four April two thousand twentyone. O Callaghan Jonathan thirteen May two thousand nineteen. SpaceX Starlink Could Cause Cascades Space Junk. Scientific American. Archived original seventeen November two thousand twenty. Retrieved two August two thousand twenty. Does Starlink Pose Space Debris Threat  Expert Answers. Archived seventeen November two thousand twenty Wayback Machine Jan Hattenbach Sky Telescope three June 2019. Starlink Block . . space. skyrocket. de. Archived original seventeen November two thousand twenty. Retrieved one July two thousand twentyone. Musk SpaceX wins Pentagon award missile tracking satellites. Reuters. five October 2020. Archived original eleven December two thousand twentytwo. Retrieved thirteen December two thousand twentytwo. SpaceX Starshield. spacex. com. Archived original fourteen December two thousand twentytwo. Retrieved thirteen December two thousand twentytwo. Boyle Alan fifteen June two thousand fifteen. Elon Musk SpaceX Plans Hyperloop Pod Races California  two thousand sixteen. NBC. Archived original one March two thousand seventeen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. Spacex Hyperloop Pod Competition PDF. SpaceX. June 2015. Archived original PDF fourteen July two thousand fifteen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. Bonasio Alice four March two thousand eighteen.  time take Hyperloop seriously. Ars Technica. Archived original twentyone April two thousand twentyone. Retrieved twentyone April two thousand twentyone. Krouse Sarah twentyone February two thousand twentyone. Elon Musk got four zero SpaceX workers join COVID nineteen study. Here learned. The Wall Street Journal. Archived original twentythree February two thousand twentyone. Retrieved twentyone February two thousand twentyone via Fox Business. Bartsch Yannic C. Fischinger Stephanie Siddiqui Sameed M. Chen Zhilin  Jingyou Gebre Makda Atyeo Caroline Gorman Matthew J. Zhu Alex Lee Kang Jaewon Burke John S. Slein Matthew Gluck Matthew J. Beger Samuel Hu Yiyuan Rhee Justin Petersen Eric Mormann Benjamin de  Aubin Michael Hasdianda Mohammad A. Jambaulikar Guruprasad Boyer Edward W. Sabeti Pardis C. Barouch Dan H. Julg Boris D. Musk Elon R. Menon Anil S. Lauffenburger Douglas A. Nilles Eric J. Alter Galit fifteen February two thousand twentyone. Discrete SARS CoV two antibody titers track functional humoral stability. Nature Communications. twelve one 1018. Bibcode 2021NatCo.. . 1018B. doi . 1038 s41467 twentyone twentyone thousand three hundred thirtysix eight. PMC seven million eight hundred eightyfour thousand four hundred. PMID thirtythree million five hundred eightynine thousand six hundred thirtysix. b Lee Timothy B. ten July two thousand eighteen. Thai official Elon Musk submarine practical mission Updated. Ars Technica. Archived original nineteen September two thousand twenty. Retrieved thirteen September two thousand twenty. Wong Julia Carrie five December two thousand nineteen. Elon Musk trial Vernon Unsworth says entrepreneur tweets humiliated. The Guardian. Archived original thirteen May two thousand twentytwo. Retrieved thirteen May two thousand twentytwo. Elon Musk elonmusk ten July two thousand eighteen. The former Thai provincial governor described inaccurately rescue chief subject matter expert.... Tweet. Archived original eighteen July two thousand eighteen. Retrieved nineteen July two thousand eighteen via Twitter. Ferris Robert ten July two thousand eighteen. Elon Musk says mini submarine used things. CNBC. Archived original thirteen July two thousand eighteen. Retrieved thirteen July two thousand eighteen. Tested Thailand SpaceX makeshift mini sub could serve space escape pod. GeekWire. com. eight July 2018. Archived original seven December two thousand nineteen. Retrieved seven December two thousand nineteen. b c Belfiore Michael twenty January two thousand twelve. Inside SpaceX  Visit Company California Headquarters Slide three. Popular Mechanics. Archived original six March two thousand seventeen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. b Hull Dana Chapa Sergio. Elon Texas Empire. bloomberg. com. Archived original five November two thousand twentyone. Retrieved eight January two thousand twentytwo. SEC Form D A. sec. gov. United States Securities Exchange Commission. Archived original eight March two thousand twentyone. Retrieved sixteen March two thousand twentyone. b c Berger Eric twentysix July two thousand nineteen. SpaceX Starship prototype taken flight first time. Ars Technica. Archived original four August two thousand nineteen. Retrieved sixteen March two thousand twentyone. SpaceX adds big new lab satellite development operation Seattle area. GeekWire. twentyseven January 2017. Archived original twelve October two thousand eighteen. Retrieved eleven October two thousand eighteen. SpaceX landing Orange County. Orange County Register. eight July 2016. Archived original twentyeight February two thousand seventeen. Retrieved eight July two thousand twenty. Berger Eric twentyeight August two thousand nineteen. Starhopper aces test sets full scale prototype flights year. Ars Technica. Archived original twentyone January two thousand twentyone. Retrieved eight January two thousand twentytwo. Paur Jason ten October two thousand twelve. Inside SpaceX Texas Rocket Testing Facility. Wired. Archived original six March two thousand seventeen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. SpaceX set activate additional test stands ahead busy two thousand twenty. nasaspaceflight. com. thirteen December 2019. Archived original twentyone June two thousand twentyone. Retrieved six June two thousand twentyone. NASA Administrator Bolden Views Historic SpaceX Dragon Capsule. nasa. gov. thirteen June 2012. Archived original twentyone June two thousand twentyone. Retrieved six June two thousand twentyone. Klotz Irene two August two thousand thirteen. SpaceX Appetite YOU. S. Launch Sites Grows. SpaceNews. Archived original two August two thousand twentythree. Retrieved twentyfour November two thousand twentytwo. SpaceX two thousand twentyone. Falcon User Guide PDF. SpaceX. p. . Archived PDF original eight December two thousand twentythree. Retrieved twentyone January two thousand twentyfour. SpaceX launches first polar orbit mission Florida decades. thirtyone August 2020. Archived original twentyfour December two thousand twentytwo. Retrieved twentyone January two thousand twentyfour. Spudis Paul D. The Tale Falcon one. Air Space Magazine. Archived original two March two thousand twentyone. Retrieved twenty May two thousand twentyone. Wolf Jim twentysix April two thousand seven. YOU. S. let us SpaceX operate Cape Canaveral. Reuters. Archived original twentyone April two thousand twentyone. Retrieved twentyone April two thousand twentyone. Howell Elizabeth twentyone May two thousand twenty. See Evolution SpaceX Rockets Pictures. Space. com. Archived original thirteen April two thousand twentyone. Retrieved twentyone April two thousand twentyone. Bergin Chris five April two thousand eleven. SpaceX Falcon Heavy Falcon nine tag team set share twenty launches year. NASASpaceFlight. com. Archived original six March two thousand seventeen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. SpaceX Falcon nine launches SAOCOM  nails first West Coast landing. NASASpaceFlight. com. seven October 2018. Archived original nine January two thousand nineteen. Retrieved eleven February two thousand nineteen. This article incorporates text source public domain Granath Bob twentyfour March two thousand fifteen. NASA SpaceX Sign Property Agreement Historic Launch Pad. NASA. Archived original seven February two thousand eighteen. Retrieved twentynine March two thousand eighteen. This article incorporates text source public domain NASA Partners Update Commercial Crew Launch Dates Commercial Crew Program. blogs. nasa. gov. six February 2019. Archived original six February two thousand nineteen. Retrieved eleven February two thousand nineteen. Ralph Eric sixteen February two thousand twentytwo. SpaceX preparing assemble launch tower Starship first Florida pad. Teslarati. Archived original seven April two thousand twentytwo. Retrieved sixteen March two thousand twentytwo. Gov. Perry Announces State Incentives Bringing SpaceX Commercial Launch Facility three hundred Jobs Brownsville Area. Office Governor Rick Perry. four August 2014. Archived original twentynine August two thousand fourteen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. Berger Eric four August two thousand fourteen. Texas SpaceX announce spaceport deal near Brownsville. MySanAntonio. com. Archived original twentyseven February two thousand seventeen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. David Leonard fifteen July two thousand fourteen. SpaceX receives FAA approval proposed spaceport Texas. CBS News. Archived original two February two thousand seventeen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. Foust Jeff twentytwo September two thousand fourteen. SpaceX Breaks Ground Texas Spaceport. SpaceNews. Archived original twentynine May two thousand sixteen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. Sheetz Michael fourteen July two thousand twentyone. FAA warns SpaceX massive Starship launch tower Texas unapproved. CNBC. Archived original four September two thousand twentyone. Retrieved twentyfour September two thousand twentyone. Koren Marina eleven February two thousand twenty. Why SpaceX Wants Tiny Texas Neighborhood  Badly. The Atlantic. Archived original fifteen August two thousand twentyone. Retrieved twentyfour September two thousand twentyone. Dennis Stone NASA Approach Commercial cargo Crew Transportation Acta Astronautica sixtythree No. one four two thousand eight 192197. Berger Eric twenty May two thousand twenty. The numbers lie NASA move commercial space saved money. Ars Technica. Archived original twentysix December two thousand twentyone. Retrieved twentysix December two thousand twentyone. b Zapata Edgar twelve September two thousand seventeen.  Assessment Cost Improvements NASA COTS CRS Program Implications Future NASA Missions PDF. AIAA Space two thousand seventeen. Archived PDF original seventeen June two thousand nineteen via NASA. Siceloff Steven. NASA SpaceX Launches Success Falcon nine Dragon Flight. nasa. gov. Archived original twelve June two thousand twenty. Retrieved thirty December two thousand twentyone. Chang Kenneth twentytwo May two thousand twelve. Big Day Space Entrepreneur Promising More. The New York Times. Archived original one July two thousand seventeen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. b Rhian Jason twentyseven September two thousand fourteen. NASA continues Commercial push CRS extension. Spaceflight Insider. Archived original twenty October two thousand sixteen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. NASA Celebrates Dragon Return. NASA. Archived original five March two thousand sixteen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. Bergin Chris three March two thousand fifteen. NASA lines four additional CRS missions Dragon Cygnus. NASASpaceFlight. com. Archived original thirty January two thousand seventeen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. de Selding Peter B. twentyfour February two thousand sixteen. SpaceX wins five new space station cargo missions NASA contract estimated seven hundred million. SpaceNews. Archived original twentyfour February two thousand sixteen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. SMSR Integrated Master Schedule PDF. Office Safety Mission Assurance. NASA. twentyeight April 2021. Archived PDF original three June two thousand twenty. Retrieved three May two thousand twentyone. Microgravity Research Flights. Glenn Research Center. NASA. twentyfive February 2021. Archived original eighteen March two thousand twentyone. Retrieved twentyseven February two thousand twentyone. Sheetz Michael twentyseven March two thousand twenty. SpaceX powerful rocket send NASA cargo moon orbit supply astronauts. CNBC. Archived original thirty March two thousand twenty. Retrieved one April two thousand twenty. Private Space Taxi Crew Escape System Passes Big Hurdle. Space. com. twentyeight October 2011. Archived original twentyseven December two thousand eleven. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. Morring Frank . twentyfive April two thousand eleven. Five Vehicles Vie For Future  YOU. S. Human Spaceflight. Aviation Week. Archived original nine May two thousand fourteen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. This article incorporates text source public domain NASA Announces Next Steps Effort Launch Americans YOU. S. Soil. NASA. three August 2012. Archived original nineteen March two thousand seventeen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. b This article incorporates text source public domain NASA Chooses American Companies Transport YOU. S. Astronauts International Space Station. NASA. sixteen September 2014. Archived original twenty March two thousand nineteen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. Post Hannah six May two thousand fifteen. Crew Dragon Completes Pad Abort Test. SpaceX. Archived original ten July two thousand eighteen. Retrieved twentytwo January two thousand twenty. Smith K. four March two thousand nineteen. Crew Dragon Docks ISS. SpaceX. Archived original seven March two thousand twenty. Retrieved twentytwo January two thousand twenty. This article incorporates text source public domain Northon Karen nineteen January two thousand twenty. NASA SpaceX Complete Final Major Flight Test Crew Spacecraft. NASA. Archived original twentythree January two thousand twenty. Retrieved twentytwo January two thousand twenty. Demo two Success Lays Groundwork Future Commercial Crew Missions. AmericaSpace. three August 2020. Archived original four December two thousand twenty. Retrieved seventeen November two thousand twenty. Wattles Jackie. SpaceX NASA mission Four astronauts arrive International Space Station. CNN. Archived original seventeen November two thousand twenty. Retrieved seventeen November two thousand twenty. Dragon Resilience Docks Space Station Expands Expedition sixtyfour Seven Crew. AmericaSpace. seventeen November 2020. Archived original seventeen November two thousand twenty. Retrieved seventeen November two thousand twenty. Sheetz Michael twentythree April two thousand twentyone. SpaceX Crew two reaches orbit Elon Musk company launching ten astronauts year. CNBC. Archived original thirteen June two thousand twentyone. Retrieved one June two thousand twentyone. Sheetz Michael twentyfour April two thousand twentyone. Two SpaceX crew spacecraft docked space station Crew two mission arrives. CNBC. Archived original two June two thousand twentyone. Retrieved one June two thousand twentyone. Stein Vicky twentythree September two thousand twentyone. Inspiration4 The first civilian spaceflight SpaceX Dragon. space. com. Archived original twentyeight September two thousand twentyone. Retrieved twentyeight September two thousand twentyone. SpaceX Awarded one hundred Million Contract From YOU. S. Air Force Falcon I Press release. SpaceX. two May 2005. Archived original thirty August two thousand eight. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. This article incorporates text source public domain NASA Awards Launch Services Contract SpaceX Press release. NASA. twentytwo April 2008. Archived original twelve March two thousand seventeen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. Grush Loren twentyfour June two thousand nineteen. Why third launch SpaceX Falcon Heavy rocket highest stakes yet. The Verge. Archived original twentysix December two thousand twentyone. Retrieved twentysix December two thousand twentyone. Shalal Andrea twentysix May two thousand fifteen. YOU. S. Air Force certifies SpaceX national security launches. Reuters. Archived original three February two thousand nineteen. Retrieved two February two thousand nineteen. Gruss Mike twentyseven April two thousand sixteen. SpaceX wins eightytwo million contract two thousand eighteen Falcon nine launch GPS three satellite. SpaceNews. Archived original twentyeight April two thousand sixteen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. Klotz Irene twentyeight April two thousand sixteen. SpaceX undercut ULA rocket launch pricing forty percent YOU. S. Air Force. Reuters. Archived original sixteen February two thousand seventeen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. SpaceX low cost GPS three launch Air Force says. SpaceNews. fifteen March 2017. Archived original two August two thousand twentythree. Retrieved twentyfour November two thousand twentytwo. Kelly Emre fifteen March two thousand eighteen. ULA SpaceX secure nearly six hundred fifty million Air Force launch contracts. Florida Today. Archived original four November two thousand eighteen. Retrieved twentynine March two thousand eighteen. SpaceX prepares first big NRO launch. SpaceNews. twentysix April 2017. Archived original twentyseven April two thousand seventeen. Retrieved two February two thousand nineteen. Erwin Sandra nineteen February two thousand nineteen. Air Force awards seven hundred thirtynine million launch contracts ULA SpaceX. SpaceNews. Archived original two June two thousand nineteen. Retrieved nineteen February two thousand nineteen. Wattles Jackie seven August two thousand twenty. SpaceX ULA win military launch competition worth six hundred fiftythree million start. CNN. Archived original eight August two thousand twenty. Retrieved eight August two thousand twenty. Erwin Sandra five October two thousand twenty. L3Harris SpaceX win Space Development Agency contracts build missile warning satellites. SpaceNews. Archived original eight October two thousand twenty. Retrieved one December two thousand twentyone. two thousand nineteen Missile Defense Review PDF. Office Secretary Defense. one November 2019. Archived PDF original eighteen January two thousand nineteen. Retrieved twentyone June two thousand twentytwo. Statement Deputy Head Russian Delegation Outer Space Disarmament Aspects. Russian Federation United Nations. twentysix October 2022. Archived original ten November two thousand twentytwo. Retrieved ten November two thousand twentytwo. Approaching Third Rail A Trilateral Treaty Prohibit Space Based Missile Defenses. Carnegie Endowment International Peace. sixteen December 2021. Archived original twenty November two thousand twentytwo. Retrieved one November two thousand twentytwo. Space based Missile Defense. Union Concerned Scientists. thirty August 2018. Archived original seventeen October two thousand twentytwo. Retrieved one December two thousand twentyone. Roulette Joey Marisa Taylor sixteen March two thousand twentyfour. Exclusive Musk SpaceX building spy satellite network  intelligence agency sources say. Reuters. Archived original twentyseven March two thousand twentyfour. Retrieved six April two thousand twentyfour. Amos Jonathan three December two thousand thirteen. SpaceX launches SES commercial  satellite Asia. BBC News. Archived original two January two thousand seventeen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. Belfiore Michael nine December two thousand thirteen. The Rocketeer. Foreign Policy. Archived original seventeen March two thousand seventeen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. Ramli David nineteen May two thousand fifteen. NBN launcher Arianespace cut jobs costs fight SpaceX. The Sydney Morning Herald Business Day. Archived original twelve June two thousand seventeen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. Shalal Andrea twentyone May two thousand fifteen. Lockheed Boeing rocket venture needs commercial orders survive. Yahoo. Archived original five March two thousand seventeen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. Avery Greg fourteen December two thousand fourteen. ULA plans new rocket restructuring cut launch costs half. Denver Business Journal. Archived original fifteen March two thousand seventeen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. Petersen Melody sixteen October two thousand fourteen. Congress OKs bill banning purchases Russian made rocket engines. Los Angeles Times. Archived original seven March two thousand seventeen. Retrieved one March two thousand seventeen. Berger Eric three June two thousand twenty. Forget Dragon Falcon nine rocket secret sauce SpaceX success. Ars Technica. Archived original seventeen August two thousand twenty. Retrieved twentyone August two thousand twenty. Lentz Danny seven April two thousand twentyfour. SpaceX debuts new Bandwagon rideshare service. NASASpaceFlight. com. Archived original eight April two thousand twentyfour. Retrieved eight April two thousand twentyfour. This article incorporates text source public domain SEC Form D Notice Exempt Offering Securities. sec. gov. four August 2020. Archived original twentyfive November two thousand twenty. Retrieved thirtyone December two thousand twenty. b Elon Musk. tesla. com. Archived original six February two thousand twentyone. Retrieved thirtyone December two thousand twenty. This article incorporates text source public domain SEC Form D Notice sale securities. United States Securities Exchange Commission SEC. nineteen August 2002. Archived original six February two thousand twentyone. Retrieved thirtyone December two thousand twenty. Kimbal Musk. tesla. com. Archived original twentyfive October two thousand twenty. Retrieved thirtyone December two thousand twenty. b c This article incorporates text source public domain SEC Form D Notice Exempt Offering Securities. sec. gov. thirty March 2009. Archived original twentytwo November two thousand twenty. Retrieved thirtyone December two thousand twenty. This article incorporates text source public domain Tzinis Irene twelve June two thousand twenty. . Gwynne Shotwell. NASA. Archived original six February two thousand twentyone. Retrieved thirtyone December two thousand twenty. Luke Nosek Gigafund Profile Biography. bloomberg. com. Bloomberg Markets. Archived original twentyfour December two thousand twentyone. Retrieved twentyfour December two thousand twentyone. Schubarth Cromwell fifteen February two thousand nineteen. The Funded Steve Jurvetson raises 200M new venture fund. Silicon Valley Business Journal. Archived original twentyeight February two thousand twentyone. Retrieved thirtyone December two thousand twenty. This article incorporates text source public domain SEC Form D Notice Exempt Offering Securities. sec. gov. nine November 2010. Archived original eleven November two thousand twenty. Retrieved thirtyone December two thousand twenty. Antonio Gracias Board Directors. tesla. com. Archived original seven January two thousand twentyone. Retrieved one February two thousand twenty. Hardy Quentin Dougherty Conor twenty January two thousand fifteen. Google Fidelity Put one Billion SpaceX Published two thousand fifteen. The New York Times. ISSN three hundred sixtytwo four thousand three hundred thirtyone. Archived original twelve November two thousand twenty. Retrieved thirtyone December two thousand twenty. Hagey Keach sixteen September two thousand twenty. Google Executive Gets Grilling Capitol Hill. The Wall Street Journal. ISSN ninetynine nine thousand six hundred sixty. Archived original fifteen November two thousand twenty. Retrieved thirtyone December two thousand twenty. Sheetz Michael eleven November two thousand twentytwo. SpaceX shakes Starship leadership Texas push rocket next milestone intensifies. CNBC. Archived original eleven November two thousand twentytwo. Retrieved eleven November two thousand twentytwo. SpaceX Gwynne Shotwell Takes Over Starbase Mars Mission. The Information. ten November 2022. Archived original eleven November two thousand twentytwo. Retrieved eleven November two thousand twentytwo. Tesla Official Afshar Turns  SpaceX New Starship Role. Bloomberg. com. ten November 2022. Archived original eleven November two thousand twentytwo. Retrieved eleven November two thousand twentytwo. Garver Lori B. two thousand twentytwo. Escaping Gravity  Quest Transform NASA Launch New Space Age. Walter Isaacson. New York Diversion Publishing Corporation. ISBN nine hundred seventyeight one sixtythree thousand five hundred seventysix seven hundred seventy four. OCLC one billion three hundred twentyeight million thirteen thousand eight hundred fiftysix. As president COO SpaceX Gwynne Shotwell effective revered female leader space community... companies reputed bro cultures. Numerous charges sexual harassment discrimination recently made public employees companies.... Progress toward diversity equity inclusion much slow. Former SpaceX workers say company culture sexual harassment. Engadget. fourteen December 2021. Archived original fourteen December two thousand twentyone. Retrieved fourteen December two thousand twentyone. Roulette Joey fourteen December two thousand twentyone. Former Interns Say SpaceX Ignored Sexual Harassment. The New York Times. ISSN three hundred sixtytwo four thousand three hundred thirtyone. Archived original twentyeight December two thousand twentyone. Retrieved fifteen December two thousand twentyone. Grush Loren fourteen December two thousand twentyone. Five former SpaceX employees speak harassment company. The Verge. Archived original fourteen December two thousand twentyone. Retrieved fourteen December two thousand twentyone. McHugh Rich nineteen May two thousand twentytwo. A SpaceX flight attendant said Elon Musk exposed propositioned sex documents show. The company paid two hundred fifty zero silence. Insider. Archived original nineteen May two thousand twentytwo. Retrieved seventeen June two thousand twentyone. Grush Loren sixteen June two thousand twentytwo. SpaceX employees draft open letter company executives denouncing Elon Musk behavior. The Verge. Archived original sixteen June two thousand twentytwo. Retrieved seventeen June two thousand twentytwo. Jacob Nutson seventeen June two thousand twentytwo. Reports SpaceX fires employees criticized Elon Musk open letter. Axios. Archived original nineteen June two thousand twentytwo. Retrieved seventeen June two thousand twentytwo. b Grush Loren four October two thousand twentyone. Blue Origin ideas mimic SpaceX sound pretty brutal employees. The Verge. Archived original four May two thousand twentytwo. Retrieved six May two thousand twentytwo. Blue Origin . SpaceX Which Winning Space Race. Alphr. Archived original eighteen May two thousand twentythree. Retrieved eighteen May two thousand twentythree. SpaceX . Blue Origin . Virgin Galactic What difference. WhatIs. com. Archived original eighteen May two thousand twentythree. Retrieved eighteen May two thousand twentythree. Shepardson David sixteen August two thousand twentyone. Blue Origin sues YOU. S. government SpaceX lunar lander contract. Reuters. Archived original eighteen May two thousand twentythree. Retrieved eighteen May two thousand twentythree. Further reading Berger Eric. Liftoff Elon Musk Desperate Early Days That Launched SpaceX. William Collins two thousand twentyone. ISBN nine hundred seventyeight eight million four hundred fortyfive thousand six hundred twentyone Davenport Christian. The Space Barons Elon Musk. Jeff Bezos Quest Colonize Cosmos. PublicAffairs two thousand eighteen. ISBN nine hundred seventyeight one billion six hundred ten million three hundred ninetyeight thousand two hundred ninetynine Fernholz Tim. Rocket Billionaires Elon Musk Jeff Bezos New Space Race. Houghton Mifflin Harcourt two thousand eighteen. ISBN nine hundred seventyeight one billion three hundred twentyeight million six hundred sixtytwo thousand two hundred thirtyone Vance Ashlee. Elon Musk How Billionaire CEO SpaceX Tesla Shaping Our Future. Penguin Random House  two thousand fifteen. ISBN nine hundred seventyeight seven hundred fiftythree million five hundred fiftyfive thousand six hundred twenty External links Wikimedia Commons media related SpaceX. Wikinews news related Wikiquote quotations related SpaceX.